de: Querschnittsform des Antriebsbands: Flach; O-Ring; Poly-V (gerippt); Rund; Gedreht (Möbius); Sonstige
sl-SI: Presek pogonskega traku Shapes: Ploščata; O-obroček; Poly-V (rebrasta); Okrogla; Zasukana (Möbius); Drugo
ja: 駆動バンドの断面Shapes: 平ら; Oリング; ポリV (リブ付き); 丸型; ひねり (メビウス); その他
th: รูปทรงหน้าตัดของแถบขับเคลื่อน: แบน; โอริง; Poly-V (แบบซี่); กลม; บิดเกลียว (เมอบิอุส); อื่นๆ
it: Shapesdella sezione trasversale della banda di trasmissione: Piatta; O-ring; Poly-V (a coste); Rotonda; Attorcigliata (Möbius); Altro
el: Σχήμα διατομής ιμάντα κίνησης: Επίπεδο; Δακτύλιος O-ring; Poly-V (ραβδωτό); Στρογγυλό; Στριμμένο (Möbius); Άλλο
hu: Hajtószalag keresztmetszeti alakja: Lapos; O-gyűrű; Hosszbordás (Poly-V); Kerek; Csavart (Möbius); Egyéb
zh-TW: 傳動帶橫截面形狀: 平面; O 型環; Poly-V (多槽); 圓形; 扭轉式 (莫比烏斯環); 其他
nb: Former av kryssting: Flat; O-ring; Poly-V (ribbet); Rund; Vridd (Möbius); Annet
sk-SK: Tvar prierezu hnacieho pásu: Plochý; O-krúžok; Poly-V (drážkovaný); Okrúhly; Pretočený (Möbius); Iné
da: Drivremmens tværsnitsform: Flad; O-ring; Poly-V (riflet); Rund; Snoet (Möbius); Andet
sv: Drivbandets tvärsnittsform: Platt; O-ring; Poly-V (ribbad); Rund; Tvinnad (Möbius); Övrigt
es: Forma de sección transversal de la correa de transmisión: Plano; Junta tórica; Poly-V (nervada); Redondo; Torcida (Möbius); Otro
fi: Vetohihnan muoto: Litteä; O-rengas; Moniura (uritettu); Pyöreä; Kierretty (Möbius); Muu
nl: Aandrijfriem doorsnedevorm: Plat; O-ring; Poly-V (geribbeld); Rond; Gedraaid (Möbius); Overige
fr: Profil de section de la courroie d’entraînement: Plate; Joint torique; Poly-V (nervurée); Ronde; Torsadée (Möbius); Autre
bg-BG: Форма на напречното сечение на задвижващия ремък: Плоско; О-пръстен; Многоклиново (оребрено); Кръгло; Усукано (Мьобиус); Друго
pt-BR: Forma seção transversal da correia de transmissão: Plana; Anel em O (O-ring); Poly-V (estriada); Redonda; Torcida (Möbius); Outros
vi: Hình dạng mặt cắt ngang của dây đai truyền động: Dẹt; Vòng chữ O; Dây đai Poly-V (gân); Tròn; Xoắn (Möbius); Khác
cs: Tvar průřezu hnacího pásu: Plochý; O-kroužek; Vícedrážkový (žebrovaný); Kulatý; Zkroucený (Möbiův pás); Jiné
en: Drive band cross-section shape: Flat; O-ring; Poly-V (ribbed); Round; Twisted (Möbius); Other
tr: Tahrik kayışı kesit şekli: Düz; O-ring; Poly-V (kanallı); Yuvarlak; Kıvrımlı (Möbius); Diğer
ru: Форма поперечного сечения приводного ремня: Плоский; Круглый (O-ring); Поликлиновой (ручейковый); Круглый; Перекрученный (Мёбиус); Другое
pl: Kształt przekroju pasa napędowego: Płaski; O-ring; Wielorowkowy (Poly-V); Okrągły; Skręcony (wstęga Möbiusa); Inne
lt-LT: Pavaros diržo skerspjūvio forma: Plokščias; O-žiedas; „Poly-V“ (briaunuotas); Apvalus; Susuktas (Mėbijaus); Kita
pt-PT: Forma da secção transversal da banda de transmissão: Plano; O-ring; Poly-V (com nervuras); Redondo; Torcido (Möbius); Outro
zh-CN: 传动带横截面形状: 扁平; O 形环; 多楔带（罗纹）; 圆截面; 扭曲（莫比乌斯环）; 其他
ko: 구동 밴드 단면 형상: 플랫; O링; 폴리 V(리브형); 라운드; 트위스트(뫼비우스); 기타
ro-RO: Forma secțiunii transversale a curelei de transmisie: Plată; Garnitură inelară; Poli-V (canelată); Rotundă; Răsucită (Möbius); Altele
hr-HR: Oblik poprečnog presjeka pogonskog remena: Ravno; O-prsten; Poly-V (rebrasto); Okruglo; Uvijeno (Möbius); Ostalo